Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6139
Experts; costs of review.

For purposes of determining whether a plan of reorganization meets the requirements of the Mutual Insurance Holding Company Act or in connection with any other matters relating to development of a plan of reorganization, the director may engage the services of experts. All reasonable costs related to the review of a plan of reorganization or such other matters, including those costs attributable to the use of experts, shall be paid by the mutual insurer making the filing or initiating discussions with the director about such matters.

Laws 1997, LB 740, § 18.